test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-esaek10_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - esäk: # Noun (10) esäk 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     esäk+N+Sg+Nom: esäk
     esäk+N+Sg+Gen: [esägu]
     esäk+N+Sg+Par: [esäkut]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ill: [esäkuhe, esäkudõ]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ine: [esäkun, esäkuh, esäkuhn]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ela: [esäkust]
     esäk+N+Sg+All: [esäkulõ]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ade: [esäkul]
     esäk+N+Sg+Abl: [esäkult]
     esäk+N+Sg+Tra: [esäkus]
     esäk+N+Sg+Ter: [esäkuniq]
     esäk+N+Sg+Abe: [esäkuldaq]
     esäk+N+Sg+Com: [esäkugaq, esägugaq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Nom: [esäguq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Gen: [esäkide, esäkiide]
     esäk+N+Pl+Par: [esäkit, esäkiid]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ill: [esäkihe, esäkiihe, esäkide, esäkiide]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ine: [esäkin, esäkiin, esäkih, esäkiih, esäkihn, esäkiihn]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ela: [esäkist, esäkiist]
     esäk+N+Pl+All: [esäkile, esäkiile]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ade: [esäkil, esäkiil]
     esäk+N+Pl+Abl: [esäkilt, esäkiilt]
     esäk+N+Pl+Tra: [esäkis, esäkiis]
     esäk+N+Pl+Ter: [esäkiniq, esäkiiniq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Abe: [esäkildäq, esäkiildäq]
     esäk+N+Pl+Com: [esäkidegaq, esäkiidegaq]
